Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4759.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Public employer" means this state, a city, village, township, county, or other political subdivision of this state; any intergovernmental, metropolitan, or local department, agency, or authority, or other local political subdivision; a school district, a public school academy, or an intermediate school district, as those terms are defined in the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852; or a community college or junior college described in section 7 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963. Public employer includes a public university that elects to come under the provisions of this act. (b) "Reemployment team" means a team created under the reemployment services for dislocated federal employees act. Sec. 3. (1) A public employer that receives a referral for employment for an individual from the reemployment team under the reemployment services for dislocated federal employees act is strongly encouraged to conduct an expedited hiring process for employment for that individual. If the public employer is this state, an employment referral and expedited hiring process must comply with section 5 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963. (2) This act does not supersede 1897 PA 205, MCL 35.401 to 35.404. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4758 (request no. H02724'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.